fi: Pähkinä-/siementyyppi: Mantelit; Parapähkinä; Cashewpähkinät; Kastanjat; Chia-siemenet; Pellavansiemen; Hasselpähkinät; Hampunsiemeniä; Macadamiapähkinä; Maapähkinät; Pekaanipähkinät; Pinjansiemenet; Pistaasipähkinät; Unikonsiemeniä; Kurpitsansiemenet; Seesaminsiemenet; Auringonkukansiemenet; Saksanpähkinät; Muu
ja: ナット/シードタイプ: アーモンド; ブラジルナッツ; カシューナッツ; 栗; チアシード; アマニ; ヘーゼルナッツ; ヘンプシード; マカダミアナッツ; ピーナッツ; ピーカン; 松の実; ピスタチオ; ケシの実; かぼちゃの種; ゴマ; ひまわりの種; クルミ; その他
es: Tipo de nuez/semilla: Almendras; Nueces de Brasil; Anacardos; Castañas; Semillas de chía; Semillas de lino; Avellanas; Semillas de cáñamo; Nueces de macadamia; Cacahuetes; Nueces pecanas; Piñones; Pistachos; Semillas de amapola; Semillas de calabaza; Semillas de sésamo; Semillas de girasol; Nueces; Otros
tr: Fındık/Tohum türü: Bademler; Brezilya fındığı; Kaju; Kestaneler; Chia tohumları; Keten tohumu; Fındıklar; Kenevir tohumu yağı; Macadamia fıstığı; Fıstıklar; Cevizler; Çam fıstığı; Kabuklu fıstıklar; Haşhaş tohumları; Kabak çekirdeği; Susam tohumları; Ayçekirdeği; Cevizler; Diğer
en: Nut/Seed type: Almonds; Brazil nuts; Cashews; Chestnuts; Chia seeds; Flax seeds; Hazelnuts; Hemp seeds; Macadamia nuts; Peanuts; Pecans; Pine nuts; Pistachios; Poppy seeds; Pumpkin seeds; Sesame seeds; Sunflower seeds; Walnuts; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta orašastih plodova / sjemenki: Bademi; Brazilski orah; Indijski oraščići; Kesteni; Chia sjemenke; Lanene sjemenke; Lješnjaci; Sjemenke konoplje; Makadamija; Kikiriki; Pekan orah; Pinjoli; Pistacije; Makovo sjeme; Sjemenke bundeve; Sjemenke sezama; Suncokretove sjemenke; Orasi; Ostalo
vi: Loại hạt: Hạnh nhân; Hạt hạch Brazil; Hạt điều; Hạt dẻ; Hạt chia; Hạt lanh; Hạt phỉ; Hạt cây gai dầu; Hạt mắc ca; Lạc; Hồ đào; Hạt thông; Quả hồ trăn; Hạt hoa anh túc; Hạt bí; Hạt vừng; Hạt hướng dương; Quả óc chó; Khác
nb: Type nøtt/frø: Mandler; Paranøtter; Cashewnøtter; Kastanjer; Chiafrø; Linfrø; Hasselnøtter; Hampfrø; Macadamianøtt; Peanøtter; Pekannøtter; Pinjekjerner; Pistasjnøtter; Valmuefrø; Gresskarfrø; Sesamfrø; Solsikkefrø; Valnøtter; Annen
da: Type af nød/frø: Mandler; Brasilianske nødder; Cashewnødder; Kastanjer; Chiafrø; Hørfrø; Hasselnødder; Hampefrø; Macadamianødder; Jordnødder; Pekannødder; Pinjekerner; Pistacienødder; Birkes; Græskarfrø; Sesamfrø; Solsikkefrø; Valnødder; Andet
sk-SK: Druh orechov/semien: Mandle; Para orechy; Kešu oriešky; Gaštany; Chia semienka; Ľanové semienka; Lieskové oriešky; Konopné semienka; Makadamové orechy; Arašidy; Pekanové orechy; Píniové oriešky; Pistácie; Makové semienka; Tekvicové semienka; Sezamové semienka; Slnečnicové semienka; Vlašské orechy; Iné
fr: Type de noix/graine: Amandes; Noix du Brésil; Cajous; Châtaignes; Graines de chia; Graines de lin; Noisettes; Graines de chanvre; Noix de macadamia; Cacahuètes; Noix de pécan; Pignons; Pistaches; Graines de pavot; Graines de citrouille; Graines de sésame; Graines de tournesol; Noix; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta oreškov/semen: Mandlji; Brazilski oreščki; Indijski oreščki; Kostanji; Chia semena; Lanena semena; Lešniki; Konopljina semena; Makadamija oreščki; Arašidi; Ameriški oreščki; Pinjole; Pistacije; Makova semena; Bučna semena; Sezamova semena; Sončnična semena; Orehi; Drugo
cs: Typ ořechu/semena: Mandle; Brazilské ořechy; Kešu; Kaštany; Chia semínka; Lněná semínka; Lískové ořechy; Konopná semínka; Makadamové ořechy; Arašídy; Pekanové ořechy; Piniové oříšky; Pistácie; Mák; Dýňová semínka; Sezamová semínka; Slunečnicová semínka; Vlašské ořechy; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип ядки/семена: Бадеми; Бразилски орехи; Кашу; Кестени; Семена от чиа; Ленени семена; Лешници; Конопени семена; Ядки макадамия; Фъстъци; Пекани; Кедрови ядки; Шамфъстъци; Макови семена; Тиквени семки; Сусамови семена; Слънчогледови семена; Орехи; Други
pl: Rodzaj orzecha/nasiona: Migdały; Orzechy brazylijskie; Nerkowce; Kasztany; Nasiona chia; Nasiona lnu; Orzechy laskowe; Nasiona konopi; Orzechy makadamia; Orzechy ziemne; Pecan; Orzechy sosny; Pistacje; Nasiona maku; Pestki dyni; Sezam; Ziarna słonecznika; Orzechy włoskie; Pozostałe
sv: Typ av nöt/frö: Mandlar; Paranötter; Cashewnötter; Kastanjer; Chiafrön; Linfrön; Hasselnötter; Hampafröolja; Macadamianötter; Jordnötter; Pekannötter; Pinjenötter; Pistagenötter; Vallmofrön; Pumpafrön; Sesamfrön; Solroskärnor; Valnötter; Annat
hu: Dió/mag típusa: Mandula; Paradió; Kesudió; Gesztenye; Chiamag; Lenmag; Mogyoró; Kendermag; Makadámdió; Mogyoró; Pekándió; Fenyőmag; Pisztácia; Mák; Tökmag; Szezámmag; Napraforgómag; Dió; Egyéb
lt-LT: Riešutų / sėklų tipas: Migdolai; Bertoletijos; Anakardžiai; Kaštainiai; Šalavijo sėklos; Linų sėklos; Lazdyno riešutai; Kanapių sėklos; Makadamijos; Žemės riešutai; Pekaninės karijos; Kedrinės pinijos; Pistacijos; Aguonų sėklos; Moliūgų sėklos; Sezamų sėklos; Saulėgrąžų sėklos; Graikiniai riešutai; Kita
el: Τύπος ξηρών καρπών/σπόρων: Αμύγδαλα; Καρύδια Βραζιλίας; Κάσιους; Κάστανα; Σπόροι Chia; Λιναρόσποροι; Φουντούκια; Σπόροι κάνναβης; Καρύδια Μακαντέμια; Φιστίκια; Πεκάν; Κουκουνάρια; Φιστίκια Αιγίνης; Σπόροι παπαρούνας; Σπόροι κολοκύθας; Σπόροι σουσαμιού; Ηλιόσποροι; Καρύδια; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de noz/semente: Amêndoas; Castanha-do-Pará; Caju; Castanhas; Sementes de chia; Sementes de linhaça; Avelãs; Sementes de cânhamo; Nozes de macadâmia; Amendoins; Nozes-pecã; Pinhões; Pistachios; Sementes de papoula; Pevides; Sementes de sésamo; Sementes de girassol; Nozes; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de nucă/semințe: Migdale; Nuci braziliene; Caju; Castane; Semințe de chia; Semințe de in; Alune; Semințe de cânepă; Nuci de macadamia; Arahide; Nuci pecan; Semințe de pin; Fistic; Semințe de mac; Semințe de dovleac; Semințe de susan; Semințe de floarea-soarelui; Nuci; Altele
nl: Type noot/zaad: Amandelen; Paranoten; Cashewnoten; Kastanjes; Chia zaden; Lijnzaad; Hazelnoten; Hennepzaden; Macadamianoten; Pinda's; Pecannoten; Pijnboompitten; Pistachenoten; Maanzaad; Pompoenpitten; Sesamzaad; Zonnebloempitten; Walnoten; Andere
it: Tipo di noce/seme: Mandorle; Noci brasiliane; Anacardi; Castagne; Semi di chia; Semi di lino; Nocciole; Olio di semi di canapa; Noci di macadamia; Arachidi; Noci Pecan; Pinoli; Pistacchi; Semi di papavero; Semi di zucca; Semi di sesamo; Semi di girasole; Noci; Altro
ko: 너트/씨앗 타입: 아몬드; 브라질너트; 캐슈; 밤; 치아 씨앗; 아마 씨앗; 헤이즐넛; 대마 씨앗; 마카다미아 너트; 땅콩; 피칸; 잣; 피스타치오; 양귀비 씨앗; 호박씨; 참깨씨; 해바라기씨; 호두; 기타
ru: Тип орехов/семян: Миндаль; Бразильские орехи; Кешью; Каштаны; Семена чиа; Семена льна; Фундук; Семена конопли; Орехи макадамия; Арахис; Пекан; Кедровые орехи; Фисташки; Семена мака; Тыквенные семечки; Семена кунжута; Семена подсолнечника; Грецкие орехи; Другое
zh-CN: 坚果/种籽类型: 杏仁; 巴西坚果; 腰果; 栗子; 奇亚籽; 亚麻籽; 榛子; 大麻籽; 澳洲坚果; 花生; 胡桃; 松子; 开心果; 罂粟籽; 南瓜籽; 芝麻籽; 葵花籽; 核桃; 其他
de: Nuss-/Samenart: Mandeln; Paranuss; Cashewkerne; Kastanien; Chia-Samen; Leinsamen; Haselnüsse; Hanfsamen; Macadamianüsse; Erdnüsse; Pecannüsse; Pinienkerne; Pistazien; Mohn; Kürbiskerne; Sesamsamen; Sonnenblumenkerne; Walnüsse; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 堅果/種子類型: 杏仁; 巴西堅果; 腰果; 栗子; 奇亞籽種子; 亞麻種子; 榛果; 大麻籽; 夏威夷豆; 花生; 美洲山核桃; 松子; 開心果; 罌粟種子; 南瓜子; 芝麻籽; 葵花籽; 胡桃; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de noz/semente: Amêndoa; Castanha-do-pará; Caju; Castanha portuguesa; Sementes de chia; Sementes de linhaça; Avelãs; Sementes de cânhamo; Macadâmia; Amendoins; Noz-pecã; Pinhão; Pistache; Sementes de papoula; Sementes de abóbora; Sementes de gergelim; Semente de girassol; Nozes; Outro
th: ประเภทถั่วเปลือกแข็ง/เมล็ดพืช: อัลมอนด์; ถั่วบราซิล; เม็ดมะม่วงหิมพานต์; เกาลัด; เมล็ดเจีย; เมล็ดแฟลกซ์; เฮเซลนัต; เมล็ดกัญชง; ถั่วแมคาเดเมีย; ถั่วลิสง; พีแคน; ถั่วเมล็ดสน; พิสตาชีโอ; เมล็ดป๊อบปี้; เมล็ดฟักทอง; เมล็ดงา; เมล็ดทานตะวัน; วอลนัต; อื่นๆ